Utah statutes.
11-1-1.   Auditor's certificate to show obligation within debt limit.

The county auditor of each county, the auditor of each city, and the clerk of each board of education in this state shall endorse a certificate upon every bond, warrant or other evidence of debt, issued pursuant to law by any such officer, that the same is within the lawful debt limit of such county, city or school district, respectively, and is issued according to law. He shall sign such certificate in his official character.

